Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.580

Substance use disorder treatment and services programs and recovery housing—Construction funds.

(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, a program is established in the department to fund the construction costs necessary to start up substance use disorder treatment and services programs and recovery housing in regions of the state that currently lack access to such programs.

(2) This funding must be used to increase the number of substance use disorder treatment and services programs and recovery housing in underserved areas such as central and eastern Washington and rural areas.

[ 2023 sp.s. c 1 s 15.]